Illinois, session 104th, SB2645.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Fire Marshal Act is amended by 5changing Section 2.8 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2905/2.8)7    Sec. 2.8. Fire Station Rehabilitation and Construction 8Grant Program. The Office shall establish and administer a 9Fire Station Rehabilitation and Construction Grant Program to 10award grants to units of local government and not-for-profit 11fire departments exempt from federal income taxes under 12Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code for the 13rehabilitation or construction of fire stations. The Office 14shall adopt any rules necessary for the implementation and 15administration of this Section.16(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 17    Section 10. The Governor's Office of Management and Budget 18Act is amended by changing Section 2.9 as follows: 19    (20 ILCS 3005/2.9)20    Sec. 2.9. Pursuant to the Grant Accountability and 21Transparency Act, to maintain a list of those individuals and   SB2645 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1entities that are ineligible, either temporarily or 2permanently, to receive an award of grant funds from the 3State.4(Source: P.A. 98-706, eff. 7-16-14.) 5    Section 15. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 6is amended by changing Sections 15, 60, and 105 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 708/15)8    Sec. 15. Definitions. As used in this Act: 9    "Allowable cost" means a cost allowable to a project if: 10        (1) the costs are reasonable and necessary for the 11    performance of the award; 12        (2) the costs are allocable to the specific project; 13        (3) the costs are treated consistently in like 14    circumstances to both federally-financed and other 15    activities of the non-federal entity;16        (4) the costs conform to any limitations of the cost 17    principles or the sponsored agreement;18        (5) the costs are accorded consistent treatment; a 19    cost may not be assigned to a State or federal award as a 20    direct cost if any other cost incurred for the same 21    purpose in like circumstances has been allocated to the 22    award as an indirect cost; 23        (6) the costs are determined to be in accordance with 24    generally accepted accounting principles;   SB2645 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1        (7) the costs are not included as a cost or used to 2    meet federal cost-sharing or matching requirements of any 3    other program in either the current or prior period;4        (8) the costs of one State or federal grant are not 5    used to meet the match requirements of another State or 6    federal grant; and7        (9) the costs are adequately documented.8    "Assistance listings" means the publicly available listing 9of federal assistance programs managed and administered by the 10General Services Administration, formerly known as the Catalog 11of Federal Domestic Assistance (CFDA). 12    "Assistance listing number" or "ALN" means a unique number 13assigned to identify a federal assistance listing, formerly 14known as the CFDA Number. 15    "Auditee" means any non-federal entity that expends State 16or federal awards that must be audited. 17    "Auditor" means an auditor who is a public accountant or a 18federal, State, or local government audit organization that 19meets the general standards specified in generally-accepted 20government auditing standards. "Auditor" does not include 21internal auditors of nonprofit organizations. 22    "Auditor General" means the Auditor General of the State 23of Illinois.24    "Award" means financial assistance that provides support 25or stimulation to accomplish a public purpose. "Awards" 26include grants and other agreements in the form of money, or   SB2645 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1property in lieu of money, by the State or federal government 2to an eligible recipient. "Award" does not include: technical 3assistance that provides services instead of money; other 4assistance in the form of loans, loan guarantees, interest 5subsidies, or insurance; direct payments of any kind to 6individuals; or contracts that must be entered into and 7administered under State or federal procurement laws and 8regulations.9    "Budget" means the financial plan for the project or 10program that the awarding agency or pass-through entity 11approves during the award process or in subsequent amendments 12to the award. It may include the State or federal and 13non-federal share or only the State or federal share, as 14determined by the awarding agency or pass-through entity.15    "Catalog of State Financial Assistance" means the single, 16authoritative, statewide, comprehensive source document of 17State financial assistance program information maintained by 18the Governor's Office of Management and Budget. 19    "Catalog of State Financial Assistance Number" means the 20number assigned to a State program in the Catalog of State 21Financial Assistance. The first 3 digits represent the State 22agency number and the last 4 digits represent the program. 23    "Cluster of programs" means a grouping of closely related 24programs that share common compliance requirements. The types 25of clusters of programs are research and development, student 26financial aid, and other clusters. A "cluster of programs"   SB2645 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1shall be considered as one program for determining major 2programs and, with the exception of research and development, 3whether a program-specific audit may be elected.4    "Cognizant agency for audit" means the federal agency 5designated to carry out the responsibilities described in 2 6CFR Part 200, Subpart F - Audit Requirements.7    "Contract" means a legal instrument by which a non-federal 8entity purchases property or services needed to carry out the 9project or program under an award. "Contract" does not include 10a legal instrument, even if the non-federal entity considers 11it a contract, when the substance of the transaction meets the 12definition of an award or subaward. 13    "Contractor" means an entity that receives a contract. 14    "Cooperative agreement" means a legal instrument of 15financial assistance between an awarding agency or 16pass-through entity and a non-federal entity that:17        (1) is used to enter into a relationship with the 18    principal purpose of transferring anything of value from 19    the awarding agency or pass-through entity to the 20    non-federal entity to carry out a public purpose 21    authorized by law, but is not used to acquire property or 22    services for the awarding agency's or pass-through 23    entity's direct benefit or use; and 24        (2) is distinguished from a grant in that it provides 25    for substantial involvement between the awarding agency or 26    pass-through entity and the non-federal entity in carrying   SB2645 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    out the activity contemplated by the award.2    "Cooperative agreement" does not include a cooperative 3research and development agreement, nor an agreement that 4provides only direct cash assistance to an individual, a 5subsidy, a loan, a loan guarantee, or insurance.6    "Corrective action" means action taken by the auditee that 7(i) corrects identified deficiencies, (ii) produces 8recommended improvements, or (iii) demonstrates that audit 9findings are either invalid or do not warrant auditee action.10    "Cost objective" means a program, function, activity, 11award, organizational subdivision, contract, or work unit for 12which cost data is desired and for which provision is made to 13accumulate and measure the cost of processes, products, jobs, 14and capital projects. A "cost objective" may be a major 15function of the non-federal entity, a particular service or 16project, an award, or an indirect cost activity.17    "Cost sharing" means the portion of project costs not paid 18by State or federal funds, unless otherwise authorized by 19statute. 20    "Development" is the systematic use of knowledge and 21understanding gained from research directed toward the 22production of useful materials, devices, systems, or methods, 23including design and development of prototypes and processes.24    "Direct costs" means:25        (1) costs that can be identified specifically with a 26    particular final cost objective, such as a State or   SB2645 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    federal or federal pass-through award or a particular 2    sponsored project, an instructional activity, or any other 3    institutional activity, or that can be directly assigned 4    to such activities relatively easily with a high degree of 5    accuracy; 6        (2) costs charged directly to a State or federal award 7    that are for the compensation of employees who work on 8    that award, their related fringe benefits, or the costs of 9    materials and other items of expense incurred for the 10    State or federal award;11        (3) costs that are directly related to a specific 12    award but that would otherwise be treated as indirect 13    costs; 14        (4) salaries of administrative and clerical staff only 15    if all the following conditions are met:16            (A) the individual's services are integral to a 17        project or activity;18            (B) the individual can be specifically identified 19        with the project or activity;20            (C) the costs are explicitly included in the 21        budget or have the prior written approval of the State 22        awarding agency; and23            (D) the costs are not also recovered as indirect 24        costs. 25    Costs incurred for the same purpose in like circumstances 26must be treated consistently as either direct costs or   SB2645 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1indirect costs. 2    "Equipment" means tangible personal property (including 3information technology systems) having a useful life of more 4than one year and a per-unit acquisition cost that equals or 5exceeds the lesser of the capitalization level established by 6the non-federal entity for financial statement purposes, or 7$5,000.8    "Executive branch" means that branch of State government 9that is under the jurisdiction of the Governor.10    "Federal agency" has the meaning provided for "agency" 11under 5 U.S.C. 551(1) together with the meaning provided for 12"agency" by 5 U.S.C. 552(f).13    "Federal award" means:14        (1) the federal financial assistance that a 15    non-federal entity receives directly from a federal 16    awarding agency or indirectly from a pass-through entity; 17        (2) the cost-reimbursement contract under the Federal 18    Acquisition Regulations that a non-federal entity receives 19    directly from a federal awarding agency or indirectly from 20    a pass-through entity; or21        (3) the instrument setting forth the terms and 22    conditions when the instrument is the grant agreement, 23    cooperative agreement, other agreement for assistance 24    covered in 2 CFR Part 200, Subpart A, Acronyms and 25    Definitions, or the cost-reimbursement contract awarded 26    under the Federal Acquisition Regulations.   SB2645 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    "Federal award" does not include other contracts that a 2federal agency uses to buy goods or services from a contractor 3or a contract to operate federal government owned, 4contractor-operated facilities. 5    "Federal awarding agency" means the federal agency that 6provides a federal award directly to a non-federal entity. 7    "Federal interest" means, for purposes of 2 CFR 200, 8Subpart D, Post Federal Award Requirements (Performance and 9Financial Monitoring and Reporting) or when used in connection 10with the acquisition or improvement of real property, 11equipment, or supplies under a federal award, the dollar 12amount that is the product of the federal share of total 13project costs and current fair market value of the property, 14improvements, or both, to the extent the costs of acquiring or 15improving the property were included as project costs.16    "Federal program" means any of the following: 17        (1) All federal awards which are assigned a single 18    number in the assistance listings. 19        (2) When no assistance listing number is assigned, all 20    federal awards to non-federal entities from the same 21    agency made for the same purpose should be combined and 22    considered one program.23        (3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of this 24    definition, a cluster of programs. The types of clusters 25    of programs are:26            (A) research and development;  SB2645 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1            (B) student financial aid; and2            (C) "other clusters", as described in the 3        definition of "cluster of programs".4    "Federal share" means the portion of the total project 5costs that are paid by federal funds.6    "Final cost objective" means a cost objective which has 7allocated to it both direct and indirect costs and, in the 8non-federal entity's accumulation system, is one of the final 9accumulation points, such as a particular award, internal 10project, or other direct activity of a non-federal entity.11    "Financial assistance" means the following:12        (1) For grants and cooperative agreements, "financial 13    assistance" means assistance that non-federal entities 14    receive or administer in the form of:15            (A) grants; 16            (B) cooperative agreements; 17            (C) non-cash contributions or donations of 18        property, including donated surplus property; 19            (D) direct appropriations; 20            (E) food commodities; and 21            (F) other financial assistance, except assistance 22        listed in paragraph (2) of this definition. 23        (2) "Financial assistance" includes assistance that 24    non-federal entities receive or administer in the form of 25    loans, loan guarantees, interest subsidies, and insurance. 26        (3) "Financial assistance" does not include amounts   SB2645 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    received as reimbursement for services rendered to 2    individuals. 3    "Fixed amount awards" means a type of grant agreement 4under which the awarding agency or pass-through entity 5provides a specific level of support without regard to actual 6costs incurred under the award. "Fixed amount awards" reduce 7some of the administrative burden and record-keeping 8requirements for both the non-federal entity and awarding 9agency or pass-through entity. Accountability is based 10primarily on performance and results. 11    "Foreign public entity" means: 12        (1) a foreign government or foreign governmental 13    entity;14        (2) a public international organization that is 15    entitled to enjoy privileges, exemptions, and immunities 16    as an international organization under the International 17    Organizations Immunities Act (22 U.S.C. 288-288f); 18        (3) an entity owned, in whole or in part, or 19    controlled by a foreign government; or 20        (4) any other entity consisting wholly or partially of 21    one or more foreign governments or foreign governmental 22    entities.23    "Foreign organization" means an entity that is: 24        (1) a public or private organization located in a 25    country other than the United States and its territories 26    that are subject to the laws of the country in which it is   SB2645 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    located, irrespective of the citizenship of project staff 2    or place of performance; 3        (2) a private nongovernmental organization located in 4    a country other than the United States that solicits and 5    receives cash contributions from the general public; 6        (3) a charitable organization located in a country 7    other than the United States that is nonprofit and tax 8    exempt under the laws of its country of domicile and 9    operation, but is not a university, college, accredited 10    degree-granting institution of education, private 11    foundation, hospital, organization engaged exclusively in 12    research or scientific activities, church, synagogue, 13    mosque, or other similar entity organized primarily for 14    religious purposes; or 15        (4) an organization located in a country other than 16    the United States not recognized as a Foreign Public 17    Entity. 18    "Fringe benefits" has the same meaning as provided in 2 19CFR Part 200, Subpart E - Cost Principles. 20    "Generally Accepted Accounting Principles" has the meaning 21provided in accounting standards issued by the Government 22Accounting Standards Board and the Financial Accounting 23Standards Board. 24    "Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards" means 25generally accepted government auditing standards issued by the 26Comptroller General of the United States that are applicable   SB2645 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1to financial audits. 2    "Grant agreement" means a legal instrument of financial 3assistance between an awarding agency or pass-through entity 4and a non-federal entity that:5        (1) is used to enter into a relationship, the 6    principal purpose of which is to transfer anything of 7    value from the awarding agency or pass-through entity to 8    the non-federal entity to carry out a public purpose 9    authorized by law and not to acquire property or services 10    for the awarding agency or pass-through entity's direct 11    benefit or use; and12        (2) is distinguished from a cooperative agreement in 13    that it does not provide for substantial involvement 14    between the awarding agency or pass-through entity and the 15    non-federal entity in carrying out the activity 16    contemplated by the award.17    "Grant agreement" does not include an agreement that 18provides only direct cash assistance to an individual, a 19subsidy, a loan, a loan guarantee, or insurance.20    "Grant application" means a specified form that is 21completed by a non-federal entity in connection with a request 22for a specific funding opportunity or a request for financial 23support of a project or activity. 24    "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital under 25the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by 26the United States, a state, or a subdivision of a state.   SB2645 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    "Illinois Stop Payment List" or "Illinois Debarred and 2Suspended List" means the list maintained by the Governor's 3Office of Management and Budget that contains the names of 4those individuals and entities that are ineligible, either 5temporarily or permanently, from receiving an award of grant 6funds from the State. 7    "Indirect cost" means those costs incurred for a common or 8joint purpose benefiting more than one cost objective and not 9readily assignable to the cost objectives specifically 10benefited without effort disproportionate to the results 11achieved.12    "Inspector General" means the Office of the Executive 13Inspector General for Executive branch agencies.14    "Loan" means a State or federal loan or loan guarantee 15received or administered by a non-federal entity. "Loan" does 16not include a "program income" as defined in 2 CFR 200, Subpart 17A, Acronyms and Definitions. 18    "Loan guarantee" means any State or federal government 19guarantee, insurance, or other pledge with respect to the 20payment of all or a part of the principal or interest on any 21debt obligation of a non-federal borrower to a non-federal 22lender, but does not include the insurance of deposits, 23shares, or other withdrawable accounts in financial 24institutions.25    "Local government" has the meaning provided for the term 26"units of local government" under Section 1 of Article VII of   SB2645 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1the Illinois Constitution and includes school districts.2    "Major program" means a federal program determined by the 3auditor to be a major program in accordance with 2 CFR Part 4200, Subpart F - Audit Requirements or a program identified as 5a major program by a federal awarding agency or pass-through 6entity in accordance with 2 CFR Part 200, Subpart F - Audit 7Requirements. 8    "Non-federal entity" means a state, local government, 9Indian tribe, institution of higher education, or 10organization, whether nonprofit or for-profit, that carries 11out a State or federal award as a recipient or subrecipient.12    "Nonprofit organization" means any corporation, trust, 13association, cooperative, or other organization, not including 14institutions of higher education, that: 15        (1) is operated primarily for scientific, educational, 16    service, charitable, or similar purposes in the public 17    interest; 18        (2) is not organized primarily for profit; and 19        (3) uses net proceeds to maintain, improve, or expand 20    the operations of the organization. 21    "Obligations", when used in connection with a non-federal 22entity's utilization of funds under an award, means orders 23placed for property and services, contracts and subawards 24made, and similar transactions during a given period that 25require payment by the non-federal entity during the same or a 26future period.   SB2645 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    "Office of Management and Budget" means the Office of 2Management and Budget of the Executive Office of the 3President.4    "Other clusters" has the meaning provided by the federal 5Office of Management and Budget in the compliance supplement 6or has the meaning as it is designated by a state for federal 7awards the state provides to its subrecipients that meet the 8definition of a cluster of programs. When designating an 9"other cluster", a state must identify the federal awards 10included in the cluster and advise the subrecipients of 11compliance requirements applicable to the cluster.12    "Oversight agency for audit" means the federal awarding 13agency that provides the predominant amount of funding 14directly to a non-federal entity not assigned a cognizant 15agency for audit. When there is no direct funding, the 16awarding agency that is the predominant source of pass-through 17funding must assume the oversight responsibilities. The duties 18of the oversight agency for audit and the process for any 19reassignments are described in 2 CFR Part 200, Subpart F - 20Audit Requirements.21    "Pass-through entity" means a non-federal entity that 22provides a subaward to a subrecipient to carry out part of a 23program. 24    "Private award" means an award from a person or entity 25other than a State or federal entity. Private awards are not 26subject to the provisions of this Act.   SB2645 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    "Property" means real property or personal property. 2    "Project cost" means total allowable costs incurred under 3an award and all required cost sharing and voluntary committed 4cost sharing, including third-party contributions. 5    "Public institutions of higher education" has the meaning 6provided in Section 1 of the Board of Higher Education Act. 7    "Recipient" means a non-federal entity that receives an 8award directly from an awarding agency to carry out an 9activity under a program. "Recipient" does not include 10subrecipients or individuals who are beneficiaries of the 11award.12    "Research and Development" means all research activities, 13both basic and applied, and all development activities that 14are performed by non-federal entities. 15    "Single Audit Act" means the federal Single Audit Act 16Amendments of 1996 (31 U.S.C. 7501-7507).17    "State agency" means an Executive branch agency. For 18purposes of this Act, "State agency" does not include public 19institutions of higher education.20    "State award" means the financial assistance that a 21non-federal entity receives from the State and that is funded 22with either State funds or federal funds; in the latter case, 23the State is acting as a pass-through entity.24    "State awarding agency" means a State agency that provides 25an award to a non-federal entity.26    "State grant-making agency" has the same meaning as "State   SB2645 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1awarding agency".2    "State interest" means the acquisition or improvement of 3real property, equipment, or supplies under a State award, the 4dollar amount that is the product of the State share of the 5total project costs and current fair market value of the 6property, improvements, or both, to the extent the costs of 7acquiring or improving the property were included as project 8costs.9    "State program" means any of the following:10        (1) All State awards which are assigned a single 11    number in the Catalog of State Financial Assistance.12        (2) When no Catalog of State Financial Assistance 13    number is assigned, all State awards to non-federal 14    entities from the same agency made for the same purpose 15    are considered one program.16        (3) A cluster of programs as defined in this Section.17    "State share" means the portion of the total project costs 18that are paid by State funds.19    "Stop payment order" means a communication from a State 20grant-making agency to the Office of the Comptroller, 21following procedures set out by the Office of the Comptroller, 22causing the cessation of payments to a recipient or 23subrecipient as a result of the recipient's or subrecipient's 24failure to comply with one or more terms of the grant or 25subaward. 26    "Stop payment procedure" means the procedure created by   SB2645 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1the Office of the Comptroller which effects a stop payment 2order and the lifting of a stop payment order upon the request 3of the State grant-making agency. 4    "Student Financial Aid" means federal awards under those 5programs of general student assistance, such as those 6authorized by Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as 7amended (20 U.S.C. 1070-1099d), that are administered by the 8United States Department of Education and similar programs 9provided by other federal agencies. "Student Financial Aid" 10does not include federal awards under programs that provide 11fellowships or similar federal awards to students on a 12competitive basis or for specified studies or research.13    "Subaward" means a State or federal award provided by a 14pass-through entity to a subrecipient for the subrecipient to 15carry out part of a federal award received by the pass-through 16entity. "Subaward" does not include payments to a contractor 17or payments to an individual that is a beneficiary of a federal 18program. A "subaward" may be provided through any form of 19legal agreement, including an agreement that the pass-through 20entity considers a contract. 21    "Subrecipient" means a non-federal entity that receives a 22State or federal subaward from a pass-through entity to carry 23out part of a State or federal program. "Subrecipient" does 24not include an individual that is a beneficiary of such 25program. A "subrecipient" may also be a recipient of other 26State or federal awards directly from a State or federal   SB2645 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1awarding agency. 2    "Suspension" means a post-award action by the State or 3federal agency or pass-through entity that temporarily 4withdraws the State or federal agency's or pass-through 5entity's financial assistance sponsorship under an award, 6pending corrective action by the recipient or subrecipient or 7pending a decision to terminate the award. 8    "Uniform Administrative Requirements, Costs Principles, 9and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards" means those rules 10applicable to grants contained in 2 CFR Part 200.11    "Unique Entity Identifier" means the number that is 12established and assigned by the federal government on the 13System for Award Management website (SAM.gov) to uniquely 14identify entities and, under federal law, is required for 15nonfederal entities to apply for, receive, and report on a 16federal award. 17    "Voluntary committed cost sharing" means cost sharing 18specifically pledged on a voluntary basis in the proposal's 19budget or the award on the part of the non-federal entity and 20that becomes a binding requirement of the award.21(Source: P.A. 103-616, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1068, eff. 3-21-25; 22104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 23    (30 ILCS 708/60)24    Sec. 60. Grant Accountability and Transparency Unit 25responsibilities.   SB2645 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    (a) The Grant Accountability and Transparency Unit within 2the Governor's Office of Management and Budget shall be 3responsible for: 4        (1) The development of minimum requirements applicable 5    to the staff of grant applicants to manage and execute 6    grant awards for programmatic and administrative purposes, 7    including grant management specialists with: 8            (A) general and technical competencies; 9            (B) programmatic expertise; 10            (C) fiscal expertise and systems necessary to 11        adequately account for the source and application of 12        grant funds for each program; and 13            (D) knowledge of compliance requirements.14        (2) The development of minimum training requirements, 15    including annual training requirements. 16        (3) Accurate, current, and complete disclosure of the 17    financial results of each funded award, as set forth in 18    the financial monitoring and reporting Section of 2 CFR 19    Part 200. 20        (4) Development of criteria for requiring the 21    retention of a fiscal agent and for becoming a fiscal 22    agent. 23        (5) Development of disclosure requirements in the 24    grant application pertaining to: 25            (A) related-party status between grantees and 26        grant-making agencies;   SB2645 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1            (B) past employment of applicant officers and 2        grant managers; 3            (C) disclosure of current or past employment of 4        members of immediate family; and5            (D) disclosure of senior management of grantee 6        organization and their relationships with contracted 7        vendors. 8        (6) Implementation of rules prohibiting a grantee from 9    charging any cost allocable to a particular award or cost 10    objective to other State or federal awards to overcome 11    fund deficiencies, to avoid restrictions imposed by law or 12    terms of the federal awards, or for other reasons. 13        (7) Implementation of rules prohibiting a non-federal 14    entity from earning or keeping any profit resulting from 15    State or federal financial assistance, unless prior 16    approval has been obtained from the Governor's Office of 17    Management and Budget and is expressly authorized by the 18    terms and conditions of the award. 19        (8) Maintenance of an Illinois Stop Payment List or an 20    Illinois Debarred and Suspended List that contains the 21    names of those individuals and entities that are 22    ineligible, either temporarily or permanently, to receive 23    an award of grant funds from the State.24        (9) Ensuring the adoption of standardized rules for 25    the implementation of this Act by State grant-making 26    agencies. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Unit   SB2645 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    shall provide such advice and technical assistance to the 2    State grant-making agencies as is necessary or indicated 3    in order to ensure compliance with this Act. 4        (10) Coordination of financial and Single Audit 5    reviews. 6        (11) Coordination of on-site reviews of grantees and 7    subrecipients. 8        (12) Maintenance of the Catalog of State Financial 9    Assistance, which shall be posted on an Internet website 10    maintained by the Governor's Office of Management and 11    Budget that is available to the public. 12        (13) Promotion of best practices for disseminating 13    information about grant opportunities to grant-making 14    agencies statewide, with an emphasis on reaching 15    previously underserved communities and grantees. 16    (b) The Grant Accountability and Transparency Unit shall 17have no power or authority regarding the approval, 18disapproval, management, or oversight of grants entered into 19or awarded by a State agency or by a public institution of 20higher education. The power or authority existing under law to 21grant or award grants by a State agency or by a public 22institution of higher education shall remain with that State 23agency or public institution of higher education. The Unit 24shall be responsible for providing technical assistance to 25guide the Administrative Code amendments proposed by State 26grant-making agencies to comply with this Act and shall be   SB2645 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1responsible for establishing standardized policies and 2procedures for State grant-making agencies in order to ensure 3compliance with the Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost 4Principles and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards set forth 5in 2 CFR Part 200, all of which must be adhered to by the State 6grant-making agencies throughout the life cycle of the grant.7    (c) The powers and functions of grant making by State 8agencies or public institutions of higher education may not be 9transferred to, nor may prior grant approval be transferred 10to, any other person, office, or entity within the executive 11branch of State government.12(Source: P.A. 103-1068, eff. 3-21-25.) 13    (30 ILCS 708/105)14    Sec. 105. Stop payment procedures.15    (a) On or before July 1, 2019, the Governor's Office of 16Management and Budget shall adopt rules pertaining to the 17following:18        (1) factors to be considered in determining whether to 19    issue a stop payment order shall include whether or not a 20    stop payment order is in the best interests of the State;21        (2) factors to be considered in determining whether a 22    stop payment order should be lifted; and23        (3) procedures for notification to the recipient or 24    subrecipient of the issuance of a stop payment order, the 25    lifting of a stop payment order, and any other related   SB2645 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1    information.2    (b) On or before December 31, 2019, the Governor's Office 3of Management and Budget shall, in conjunction with State 4grant-making agencies, adopt rules pertaining to the 5following:6        (1) policies regarding the issuance of stop payment 7    orders;8        (2) policies regarding the lifting of stop payment 9    orders;10        (3) policies regarding corrective actions required of 11    recipients and subrecipients in the event a stop payment 12    order is issued; and13        (4) policies regarding the coordination of 14    communications between the Office of the Comptroller and 15    State grant-making agencies regarding the issuance of stop 16    payment orders and the lifting of such orders.17    (c) On or before July 1, 2020, the Office of the 18Comptroller shall establish stop payment procedures that shall 19cause the cessation of payments to a recipient or 20subrecipient. Such a temporary or permanent cessation of 21payments will occur pursuant to a stop payment order requested 22by a State grant-making agency and implemented by the Office 23of the Comptroller.24    (d) The State grant-making agency shall maintain a file 25pertaining to all stop payment orders which shall include, at 26a minimum:  SB2645 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1        (1) The notice to the recipient or subrecipient that a 2    stop payment order has been issued. The notice shall 3    include:4            (A) The name of the grant.5            (B) The grant number.6            (C) The name of the State agency that issued the 7        grant.8            (D) The reasons for the stop payment order.9            (E) Any other relevant information.10        (2) The order lifting the stop payment order, if 11    applicable. 12    (e) The Grant Accountability and Transparency Unit shall 13determine and disseminate factors that State agencies shall 14consider when determining whether it is in the best interests 15of the State to permanently or temporarily cease payments to a 16recipient or subrecipient who has had a stop payment order 17requested by another State agency.18    (f) The Office of the Comptroller and the Governor's 19Office of Management and Budget grant systems shall determine 20if the recipient or subrecipient has received grants from 21other State grant-making agencies.22    (g) Upon notice from the Office of the Comptroller, the 23Grant Accountability and Transparency Unit shall notify all 24State grant-making agencies who have issued grants to a 25recipient or subrecipient whose payments have been subject to 26a stop payment order that a stop payment order has been   SB2645 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 13047 BDA 24983 b1requested by another State grant-making agency.2    (h) Upon notice from the Grant Accountability and 3Transparency Unit, each State grant-making agency who has 4issued a grant to a recipient or subrecipient whose payments 5have been subject to a stop payment order shall review and 6assess all grants issued to that recipient or subrecipient. 7State agencies shall use factors provided by the Governor's 8Office of Management and Budget or the Grant Accountability 9and Transparency Unit to determine whether it is in the best 10interests of the State to request a stop payment order. 11(Source: P.A. 100-997, eff. 8-20-18.)